Massachusetts, session 194th, H4195.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 10A of chapter 255D of the General Laws is hereby amended by at the end
thereof, the following words: "No retail or service establishment of any kind shall require the
transfer of cash into electronic debit or credit cards to process transactions. All establishments
shall be required to accept cash for any transaction."
of 1